examples/apertium-hin.hin.dix.xml
    <pardef n="ध/ी__n_f">
      <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ियाँ</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ियों</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="ऐ__n_m">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<pardef n="कासाळें__n_mf">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<pardef n="क्रिसमस__n_mf">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
          
    <pardef n="ऐ__n_f">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
         
    <pardef n="थ__n_m">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ों</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="मचिय/ा__n_f">
      <e><p><l>ा</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ा</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ाँ</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ों</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="नति__n_f">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>याँ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>यों</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="थ/ू__n_m">               
   	  <e><p><l>ू</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ू</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ू</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ुओं</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="ध/ा__n_m">

      <e><p><l>ा</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>े</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>े</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ों</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ध/ा__n_f">
        <e><p><l>ा</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>े</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>े</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ों</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
	<e r="LR"><p><l>ो</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="इ__n_m">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>यों</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="हनु__n_f">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>एँ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ओं</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="माँ__n_f">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>यें</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ओं</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<pardef n="माँ__n_sg">
      <e><p><l>मम्मी</l><r>माँ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
        
    <pardef n="पौ/आ__n_m">
      <e><p><l>आ</l><r>आ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ए</l><r>आ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ए</l><r>आ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ओं</l><r>आ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="कम/ी__n_f">
      <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ियाँ</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e r="LR"><p><l>ी</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ियों</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="/ऊ__n_m">
      <e><p><l>ऊ</l><r>ऊ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ऊ</l><r>ऊ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ऊ</l><r>ऊ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>उओं</l><r>ऊ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="जरद/ा__n_m">
      <e><p><l>ा</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>े</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>े</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ों</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e r="LR"><p><l>े</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="ऋ__n_m">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ओं</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<pardef n="null__n_sg">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<pardef n="गुरु__n_sg">
      <e><p><l>जन</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>जी</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     

	<e lm="कासाळें"><i>कासाळें</i><par n="कासाळें__n_mf"/></e>
	<e lm="कैल"><i>कैल</i><par n="कासाळें__n_mf"/></e>
	<e lm="क्रिसमस"><i>क्रिसमस</i><par n="क्रिसमस__n_mf"/></e>
	<e lm="मराठी"><i>मराठ</i><par n="कम/ी__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="अफ्रीकी"><i>अफ्रीक</i><par n="कम/ी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="सेवानिवृत्ति"><i>सेवानिवृत्ति</i><par n="इ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="पंचकोण"><i>पंचकोण</i><par n="ऐ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="क्षति"><i>क्षति</i><par n="इ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="गुडिया"><i>गुडिय</i><par n="मचिय/ा__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="झगडालू"><i>झगडाल</i><par n="थ/ू__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="पांशु"><i>पांशु</i><par n="हनु__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="बाहु"><i>बाहु</i><par n="हनु__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="निर्माता"><i>निर्माता</i><par n="ऋ__n_m"/></e>
	<e lm="ऐड्रेस"><i>ऐड्रेस</i><par n="थ__n_m"/></e>
	<e lm="अवि"><i>अवि</i><par n="नति__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="सुग्राही"><i>सुग्राह</i><par n="ध/ी__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="इंदु"><i>इंदु</i><par n="हनु__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="दर्रा"><i>दर्र</i><par n="ध/ा__n_m"/></e>
	<e lm="मस्तगी"><i>मस्तगी</i><par n="ऐ__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="पर्णांग"><i>पर्णांग</i><par n="थ__n_m"/></e>
	<e lm="सी.पी.यू"><i>सी.पी.यू</i><par n="ऐ__n_m"/></e>
	<e lm="एड़ी"><i>एड़</i><par n="ध/ी__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="रतालू"><i>रताल</i><par n="थ/ू__n_m"/></e>
	<e lm="वीथी"><i>वीथ</i><par n="ध/ी__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="फ़रिश्ता"><i>फ़रिश्त</i><par n="ध/ा__n_m"/></e>
	<e lm="अदाकारा"><i>अदाकार</i><par n="मचिय/ा__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="मार्लिन"><i>मार्लिन</i><par n="ऐ__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="अनुक्षेत्र"><i>अनुक्षेत्र</i><par n="थ__n_m"/></e>
	<e lm="पीतचटकी"><i>पीतचटक</i><par n="ध/ी__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="टट्टू"><i>टट्ट</i><par n="थ/ू__n_m"/></e>
	<e lm="दसवाँ"><i>दसवाँ</i><par n="ऐ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="केंचुली"><i>केंचुल</i><par n="कम/ी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="पुलिस"><i>पुलिस</i><par n="ऐ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="बकसुआ"><i>बकसु</i><par n="पौ/आ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="गवैया"><i>गवैय</i><par n="ध/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रदाता"><i>प्रदाता</i><par n="ऋ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="माँ"><i>माँ</i><par n="माँ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="मां"><i>मां</i><par n="माँ__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="शिक्षिका"><i>शिक्षिका</i><par n="माँ__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="मम्मी"><i></i><par n="माँ__n_sg"/></e>
    <e lm="पंक्ति"><i>पंक्ति</i><par n="नति__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="चालबाजी"><i>चालबाज</i><par n="कम/ी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="पौआ"><i>पौ</i><par n="पौ/आ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="शनि"><i>शनि</i><par n="इ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="श्मश्रु"><i>श्मश्रु</i><par n="ऋ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="मृत्यु"><i>मृत्यु</i><par n="हनु__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ताऊ"><i>ता</i><par n="/ऊ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="मुठिया"><i>मुठिय</i><par n="मचिय/ा__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="दैव"><i>दैव</i><par n="थ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="बटुआ"><i>बटु</i><par n="पौ/आ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="पवनचक्की"><i>पवनचक्क</i><par n="ध/ी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="जूआ"><i>जू</i><par n="पौ/आ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="उपोद्घात"><i>उपोद्घात</i><par n="ऐ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="बाजू"><i>बाज</i><par n="थ/ू__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="बट्टा"><i>बट्ट</i><par n="ध/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="रोगाणु"><i>रोगाणु</i><par n="ऋ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="रात्रि"><i>रात्रि</i><par n="नति__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="नीलिमा"><i>नीलिमा</i><par n="ऐ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="जायका"><i>जायक</i><par n="जरद/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ऋषि"><i>ऋषि</i><par n="इ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="मचिया"><i>मचिय</i><par n="मचिय/ा__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="मुनाफा"><i>मुनाफ</i><par n="जरद/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="लब्धि"><i>लब्धि</i><par n="नति__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="गुरु"><i>गुरु</i><par n="गुरु__n_sg"/></e>
	<e lm="फलोद्यान"><i>फलोद्यान</i><par n="null__n_sg"/></e>
	<e lm="लूका-छुपी"><i>लूका-छुपी</i><par n="null__n_sg"/></e>
	<e lm="मुह"><i>मुह</i><par n="null__n_sg"/></e>
	<e lm="रौप्यपदक"><i>रौप्यपदक</i><par n="null__n_sg"/></e>
    <e lm="गलसुआ"><i>गलसु</i><par n="पौ/आ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="अनौचित्य"><i>अनौचित्य</i><par n="ऐ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="हँसिया"><i>हँसिय</i><par n="ध/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="विसंगति"><i>विसंगति</i><par n="इ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="रज्जु"><i>रज्जु</i><par n="हनु__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="सज्जन"><i>सज्जन</i><par n="थ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="कलाबाजी"><i>कलाबाज</i><par n="कम/ी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="फूफा"><i>फूफा</i><par n="ऋ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="गलती"><i>गलत</i><par n="ध/ी__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="तृप्ति"><i>तृप्ति</i><par n="ऐ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="बोरिया"><i>बोरिय</i><par n="मचिय/ा__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="अनुकृति"><i>अनुकृति</i><par n="नति__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="कीमा"><i>कीम</i><par n="जरद/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="हिंदू"><i>हिंद</i><par n="थ/ू__n_m"/></e>
